Colorado, session 2026A, SB112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 16-4-113 as
-2- SB26-112

follows:
16-4-113. Type of bond in certain nonfelony cases.
(1) (a) In exercising the discretion mentioned in section 16-4-104,
the EXCEPT IN THE CIRCUMSTANCES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF
THIS SECTION, IF AN ACCUSED PERSON IS CHARGED WITH COMMITTING AN
OFFENSE FOR WHICH THE MAXIMUM PENALTY DOES NOT EXCEED SIX
MONTHS' IMPRISONMENT, A judge shall release the accused person upon
personal recognizance if the charge is any offense for a violation of which
the maximum penalty does not exceed six months' imprisonment, and the
AND, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL
NOT REQUIRE THE accused person shall not be required to supply a surety
bond or give security of any kind for their appearance for trial other than
their personal recognizance. unless one or more of the following facts are
found to be present:
(b) A JUDGE MAY REQUIRE THE ACCUSED PERSON TO SUPPLY A
SURETY BOND OR GIVE SECURITY FOR THE ACCUSED PERSON'S
APPEARANCE FOR TRIAL OTHER THAN THEIR PERSONAL RECOGNIZANCE IF:
(a) (I) The arrested person fails to sufficiently identify himself or
herself THEMSELF; or
(b) (II) The arrested person refuses to sign a personal
recognizance; or
(c) (III) The continued detention or posting of a surety bond is
necessary to prevent imminent bodily harm to the accused PERSON or to
another; or
(d) (IV) The arrested person has no ties to the jurisdiction of the
court reasonably sufficient to assure his or her THEIR appearance, and
there is substantial likelihood that he or she THE PERSON will fail to
-3- SB26-112

appear for trial if released upon his or her THEIR personal recognizance;
or
(e) (V) The arrested person has previously failed to appear for trial
for an offense concerning which he or she THE PERSON had given his
THEIR written promise to appear; or
(f) (VI) There is outstanding a warrant for his or her THE PERSON'S
arrest on any other charge or there are pending proceedings against him
or her THEM for suspension or revocation of parole or probation; OR
(VII) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (3) AND (4) OF THIS SECTION, THE
PERSON HAS PREVIOUSLY FAILED TO APPEAR FOR A COURT PROCEEDING AS
REQUIRED BY A COURT TWO OR MORE TIMES IN THE PRESENT CASE.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (1) APPLIES IN STATE AND MUNICIPAL
COURTS.
(2) (a) A COURT SHALL NOT IMPOSE A MONETARY CONDITION OF
RELEASE for a defendant charged with:
(I) A traffic offense, a petty offense, or a comparable municipal
offense, a court shall not impose a monetary condition of release. If the
INCLUDING A comparable municipal offense THAT is a property crime and
the factual basis reflects a value of property loss or damage that would be
a petty offense property crime if charged under state law; this subsection
(2)(a) applies. OR
(II) A MUNICIPAL OFFENSE FOR WHICH THERE IS NO COMPARABLE
STATE MISDEMEANOR OFFENSE.
(b) For a defendant charged with a municipal offense for which
there is no comparable state misdemeanor offense, the court shall not
impose a monetary condition of release.
(c) (b) THIS SUBSECTION (2) DOES NOT PROHIBIT:
-4- SB26-112

(I) THE RELEASE OF A DEFENDANT, PURSUANT TO LOCAL PRETRIAL
RELEASE POLICIES, after arrest but prior to an individual consideration of
bond by a judge, bonding commissioner, judicial officer, or judicial
designee with the power to set conditions of release, this subsection (2)
does not prohibit the release of a defendant pursuant to local pretrial
release policies, including those LOCAL PRETRIAL RELEASE POLICIES that
require payment of a monetary condition of release, if the defendant is
first informed that the defendant is entitled to release on a personal
recognizance bond; OR
(d) (II) Nothing in this subsection (2) prohibits the issuance of A
COURT FROM ISSUING a warrant with monetary conditions of bond for a
defendant who fails to appear in court as required or who violates a
condition of release. If a defendant is unable to post the monetary
condition of bond prior to the next individualized consideration of bond,
the judge, bonding commissioner, judicial officer, or judicial designee
with the power to set conditions of release shall release the person on
personal recognizance.
(e) (c) The provisions of This subsection (2) do DOES not apply to:
(I) A traffic offense involving death or bodily injury or a
municipal offense with substantially similar elements;
(II) Eluding or attempting to elude a police officer as described in
section 42-4-1413 or a municipal offense with substantially similar
elements;
(III) Operating a vehicle after circumventing an interlock device
as described in section 42-2-132.5 (10) or a municipal offense with
substantially similar elements; and
(IV) A municipal offense that has substantially similar elements
-5- SB26-112

to a state misdemeanor offense;
(V) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (3) AND (4) OF THIS SECTION, A
PETTY OFFENSE FOR THEFT, CRIMINAL MISCHIEF, OR ARSON, OR A
COMPARABLE MUNICIPAL OFFENSE, IF THE DEFENDANT HAS PREVIOUSLY
FAILED TO APPEAR FOR A COURT PROCEEDING AS REQUIRED BY A COURT
TWO OR MORE TIMES IN THE PRESENT CASE; AND
(VI) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (3) AND (4) OF THIS SECTION, A
PETTY OFFENSE, TRAFFIC OFFENSE, OR A COMPARABLE MUNICIPAL OFFENSE
OR A MUNICIPAL OFFENSE FOR WHICH THERE IS NO COMPARABLE STATE
OFFENSE, THAT IS NOT LISTED IN SUBSECTION (2)(c)(V) OF THIS SECTION
IF THE DEFENDANT HAS PREVIOUSLY FAILED TO APPEAR FOR A COURT
PROCEEDING AS REQUIRED BY A COURT TWO OR MORE TIMES IN THE
PRESENT CASE AND HAS ANOTHER PENDING CASE FOR THE SAME OFFENSE
IN THE SAME JURISDICTION.
(3) A DEFENDANT'S FAILURE TO BE PRESENT FOR A COURT
PROCEEDING AS REQUIRED BY A COURT IS NOT CONSIDERED A FAILURE TO
APPEAR FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION IF THE DEFENDANT'S COUNSEL IS
PRESENT AND THE COURT PROCEEDING IS NOT THE DEFENDANT'S TRIAL OR
ARRAIGNMENT, A CONTESTED HEARING, OR A HEARING IN WHICH A
WITNESS OR VICTIM IS TESTIFYING BEFORE THE COURT. THE DEFENDANT
MUST BE PRESENT FOR ALL COURT PROCEEDINGS AS REQUIRED BY THE
COURT IF THE DEFENDANT IS SELF-REPRESENTED.
(4) A FAILURE TO APPEAR THAT OCCURRED IN A MUNICIPAL COURT
ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (4) QUALIFIES AS
A PREVIOUS FAILURE TO APPEAR FOR THE PURPOSES OF SUBSECTIONS
(1)(b)(VII), (2)(c)(V), AND (2)(c)(VI) OF THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE
MUNICIPAL COURT:
-6- SB26-112

(a) PRIOR TO ISSUING A WARRANT FOR THE ARREST OF THE
DEFENDANT FOR THE PREVIOUS FAILURE TO APPEAR, CONDUCTED AN
ELECTRONIC SEARCH OF AVAILABLE COURT DATABASES OR ONLINE
RESOURCES TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE DEFENDANT WAS BEING HELD
IN A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 17-1-102, OR IN THE
COUNTY JAIL FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE COURT IS LOCATED; AND
(b) AT THE TIME OF THE DEFENDANT'S PREVIOUS FAILURE TO
APPEAR:
(I) HAD A PROCESS THAT ALLOWS A DEFENDANT TO INFORMALLY
CONTACT THE COURT BY REMOTE MEANS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED
TO, BY PHONE OR EMAIL, ON OR BEFORE THE DAY OF THE COURT
APPEARANCE TO REQUEST A CONTINUANCE, AND THAT AFTER THE
DEFENDANT ENGAGES THE PROCESS, ALLOWS THE COURT TO REQUIRE THE
DEFENDANT TO MAKE THE REQUEST IN WRITING AND SEND THE REQUEST
TO THE COURT BY ANY MEANS, INCLUDING EMAIL;
(II) HAD A PROCESS TO QUASH A WARRANT FOR A FAILURE TO
APPEAR THAT ALLOWS THE DEFENDANT TO CONTACT THE COURT FOR THE
PURPOSE OF RESETTING THE DEFENDANT'S APPEARANCE AFTER THE
DEFENDANT'S FAILURE TO APPEAR BUT PRIOR TO THE DEFENDANT'S NEXT
COURT PROCEEDING, AND THAT AFTER THE DEFENDANT ENGAGES THE
PROCESS, ALLOWS THE COURT TO REQUIRE THE DEFENDANT TO MAKE THE
REQUEST IN WRITING AND SEND THE REQUEST TO THE COURT BY ANY
MEANS, INCLUDING EMAIL, AND A PROCESS TO EXCUSE A FAILURE TO
APPEAR IF THE DEFENDANT APPEARS AT THE NEXT COURT PROCEEDING;
(III) HAD A PROCESS FOR THE COURT TO EXCUSE A DEFENDANT'S
FAILURE TO APPEAR FOR A COURT PROCEEDING IF THE DEFENDANT
PRODUCES EVIDENCE SHOWING THAT THEIR FAILURE TO APPEAR WAS NOT
-7- SB26-112

WILLFUL OR WAS CAUSED BY EXCUSABLE NEGLECT; AND
(IV) POSTED THE PROCESSES DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4)
ONLINE AND AT THE COURTHOUSE, IN BOTH ENGLISH AND SPANISH.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-10-127, add (1.5)
as follows:
13-10-127. Failure to appear.
(1.5) IF A PERSON IS NOT PRESENT AT THE PLACE AND TIME
SPECIFIED IN THE SUMMONS OR SUMMONS AND COMPLAINT, BUT THE
PERSON'S COUNSEL IS PRESENT, THE COURT SHALL NOT CONSIDER THE
PERSON'S ABSENCE A FAILURE TO APPEAR.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to offenses committed on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-8- SB26-112